Hawaii statutes.
PART
VIII. STATE RENT SUPPLEMENT PROGRAM

§356D-151 Rent supplements. The
authority is authorized to make and contract to make annual payments to a
housing owner on behalf of a qualified tenant as those terms are defined in
this part, in amounts and under circumstances as are prescribed by the
authority pursuant to rules adopted by the authority. [L 2006, c 180, pt of §2;
am L 2007, c 223, §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next